Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 4 TEMPORARY CUSTODY AND SHELTER
19-3-406. Fingerprint-based criminal history record check - providers of emergency placement for children - use of criminal justice records - definitions - rules.

Any time a child is taken into temporary custody by a law enforcement officer and any time the court places temporary custody of a child with a county department pursuant to the provisions of this part 4, and a relative or other available person is identified
as a potential emergency placement for the child, the county department or a local law enforcement agency shall immediately conduct an initial criminal history record check of the relative or other available person prior
to the county department or the law enforcement officer placing the child in the emergency placement. A county department may perform initial criminal history record checks through its staff or may collaborate with local
law enforcement agencies to perform the initial criminal history record checks. When a county department has temporary custody of a child pursuant to the provisions of this part 4 and contacts the local law enforcement
agency for an initial criminal history record check of a person who is identified as a potential emergency placement for the child pursuant to the provisions of this section, the local law enforcement agency shall immediately
provide the county department with a verbal response regarding the person's criminal history and shall not provide the county department with documentation of the person's criminal history, consistent with the provisions
of Public Law 92-544, and regulations promulgated thereunder, as amended.

The child may not be placed with the relative or other available person if the initial criminal history record check conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) reflects a criminal history described in subsection (4) of this section.

The child may be placed with the relative or other available person if the initial criminal history record check does not reflect a criminal history described in subsection (4) of this section; except that the relative or other person who is not disqualified
based upon the results of the initial criminal history record check conducted pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section shall report to local law enforcement, to the county department when the county department has
a fingerprint machine, or to another designated third party approved by the Colorado bureau of investigation to obtain a set of fingerprints for a fingerprint-based criminal history record check as described in subsections
(2) and (3) of this section and all of the other required background checks described in subsection (4.5) of this section. If an approved third party takes the person's fingerprints, the fingerprints may be electronically
captured using Colorado bureau of investigation-approved livescan equipment. Third-party vendors shall not keep the relative's or other person's information for more than thirty days unless requested to do so by the relative
or other person.

A relative or other available person who is not disqualified as an emergency placement for a child pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section and who authorizes a child to be placed with him or her on an emergency basis pursuant to the provisions of
this part 4 shall submit a complete set of his or her fingerprints to the county department no later than five days after the child is placed in the person's home or no later than fifteen calendar days when exigent circumstances
exist. If the relative or other available person fails to submit a complete set of his or her fingerprints to the county department, the county department or the law enforcement officer, as appropriate, shall immediately remove
the child from the physical custody of the person. The county department shall confirm within fifteen days after the child has been placed with the relative or other available person that the relative or other available person
identified by the county department submitted a complete set of his or her fingerprints within the time period specified by this subsection (2).

When a person submits a complete set of his or her fingerprints to the county department, the county department shall immediately forward the fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of obtaining a fingerprint-based criminal
history record check. Upon receipt of fingerprints and payment for the costs, the Colorado bureau of investigation shall conduct a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check utilizing records of the Colorado
bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. The results of the state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record checks conducted pursuant to this section shall be forwarded immediately to the agency
authorized to receive the information. If the fingerprint-based criminal history record check indicates that the person has a criminal history described in subsection (4) of this section, the county department or the local law
enforcement officer, whichever is appropriate, shall immediately remove the child from the emergency placement and shall not place a child with the person who has the criminal history without court involvement and an order of the
court affirming placement of the child with the person.

A county department or a local law enforcement agency shall not make an emergency placement or continue the emergency placement of a child with a person who has been convicted of one or more of the following offenses:

Child abuse, as described in section 18-6-401, C.R.S.;

A crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S.;

An offense involving unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), C.R.S.;

A felony, the underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court on the record to include an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3, C.R.S.;

A felony involving physical assault or a drug-related offense, committed within the preceding five years;

Violation of a protection order, as described in section 18-6-803.5, C.R.S.;

A crime involving homicide; or

An offense in any other state, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of any one of the offenses described in paragraphs (a) to (g) of this subsection (4).

(4.5) (a) If a relative or other person was not disqualified as an emergency placement based upon the fingerprint-based criminal history record check and the child was placed in an emergency placement with such person, the county department shall perform
the following additional background checks of the relative or other person:

A check of the ICON system at the state judicial department pursuant to section 26-6-910 (5)(b) to determine the status or disposition of any criminal charges;

A check of the state department's automated database for information to inform decisions about placement to determine if the person has been identified as having a finding of child abuse or neglect and whether such finding presents an unsafe placement
for the child; and

A check against the state's sex offender registry and against the national sex offender public registry operated by the United States department of justice that checks names and addresses against the known names and addresses in the registries and the
interactive database system for Colorado to determine if a person is a registered sex offender.

If information is found as a result of the additional background checks of the relative or other person that indicate that continued placement with that relative or other person would no longer be safe for the child, the county department shall remove
the child from that placement.

The county department shall also request that a local law enforcement agency perform a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check of any person residing in the home to determine if the person has a criminal history as described
in subsection (4) of this section and also perform the additional background checks described in subparagraphs (I) and (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4.5). The local law enforcement agency shall provide the county
department with the results of the state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check within forty-eight hours. If the fingerprint-based criminal history record check indicates that a person residing in
the home has a criminal history described in subsection (4) of this section or the information from the other background checks raises issues about the safety of the child in the home, the county department shall evaluate
the continued placement of the child in the home and develop a plan to address the issues within fourteen days. A county department shall remedy the situation as quickly as possible and no later than two weeks after the
placement. The state board shall promulgate rules to address child safety and what must be considered in the evaluation.

The state board shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section, consistent with the provisions contained in part 3 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

For purposes of this section, "initial criminal history record check" means a name-based state and federal criminal history record check performed by a local law enforcement agency utilizing the records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the
federal bureau of investigation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if the county department verifies and documents that all of the criminal history record checks and other background checks described in subsection (4.5) of this section have been completed in the preceding
three months for a relative, other person, or a person residing in the home, the county department does not need to repeat the fingerprint-based criminal history record check of that relative, other person, or a person residing
in the home; except that the county department shall repeat the other background checks described in subsection (4.5) of this section and contact local law enforcement to determine if there were any new charges for offenses filed
against that relative, other person, or a person residing in the home during the preceding three months since the last fingerprint-based criminal history record check.

The Colorado bureau of investigation shall flag the fingerprints of and notify the applicable county department of any new arrests of an individual whose fingerprints the county department submits to a local law enforcement agency that the county department
also intends to be subsequently used for foster care certification.

The county department shall notify the Colorado bureau of investigation within five calendar days after submitting the request for a fingerprint-based criminal history record check when the county department intends to accept an application for foster
care certification from that person so that the flagging and automatic notification to the county department of new arrests pursuant to subsection (8)(a) of this section occurs for that person and continues through the
duration of the individual's foster care certification. The county department shall use the same fingerprints received under this subsection (8) and any updated fingerprint-based criminal history record check results from
the automatic notification as a substitute for meeting the fingerprint requirements for a person who is applying for foster care certification pursuant to section 26-9-910.

Source:

L. 2005:
Entire section added, p. 616, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2007:
(2) amended, p. 1017, § 6, effective May 22.

L. 2015:
Entire section amended, (SB 15-087), ch. 263, p. 1012, § 9, effective June 2.

L. 2017:
(1)(c), (2), and (3) amended, (SB 17-189), ch. 149, p. 499, § 6, effective August 9.

L. 2022:
(4.5)(a)(I) and (8)(b) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 835, § 39, effective July 1.

19-3-407. Noncertified kinship care - requirement for background checks and other checks - definitions.

Except as described in subsection (1)(a) of this section, a county department shall request that a local law enforcement agency conduct the following background checks of kin or any adult who resides at the home prior to placing a child in noncertified
kinship care, unless such placement is an emergency placement pursuant to section 19-3-406:

A fingerprint-based criminal history record check through the Colorado bureau of investigation, which criminal history record check may be conducted by any third party approved by the bureau, and the federal bureau of investigation to determine if the
kin or an adult who resides at the home has been convicted of:

Child abuse, as specified in section 18-6-401, C.R.S.;

A crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S.;

An offense involving unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), C.R.S.;

A felony, the underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court on the record to include an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3, C.R.S.;

A felony involving physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense within the five years preceding the date of application for a certificate;

A pattern of misdemeanor convictions, as defined by rule of the state board, within the ten years immediately preceding the date of submission of the application; or

Any offense in any other state, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of any one of the offenses described in sub-subparagraphs (I) to (VI) of this paragraph (a);

A check of the ICON system at the state judicial department to determine the status or disposition of any pending criminal charges brought against the kin or an adult who resides at the home that were identified by the fingerprint-based criminal history
record check through the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation;

A check of the state department's automated database for information to determine if the kin or an adult who resides at the home has been identified as having a finding of child abuse or neglect and whether such finding has been determined to present
an unsafe placement for a child; and

A check against the state's sex offender registry and against the national sex offender public registry operated by the United States department of justice that checks names and addresses in the registries and the interactive database system for Colorado
to determine if the kin or an adult who resides at the home is a registered sex offender.

A county department shall not place a child in noncertified kinship care if the kin or any adult who resides with the kin at the home:

Has been convicted of any of the crimes listed in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section;

Is a registered sex offender in the sex offender registry created pursuant to section 16-22-110, C.R.S., or is a registered sex offender as determined by a check of the national sex offender registry operated by the United States department of justice.
The sex offender registry checks must check the kin's or adult resident's known names and addresses in the interactive database system for Colorado or the national sex offender public registry against all of the registrant's
known names and addresses; or

Has been identified as having a finding of child abuse or neglect through a check of the state department's automated database and that finding has been determined to present an unsafe placement for the child.

A county department may make a placement with noncertified kin that would otherwise be disqualified pursuant to subsection (2) of this section or allow continued placement with noncertified kin if an adult residing in the home would otherwise be disqualified
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section if such placement occurs according to rules promulgated by the state board or if there is county-initiated court involvement and an order of the court affirming placement of the child
with the kin.

For the purposes of this section, "convicted" means a conviction by a jury or by a court and includes a deferred judgment and sentence agreement, a deferred prosecution agreement, a deferred adjudication agreement, an adjudication, or a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere; except that this does not apply to a diversion or deferral or plea for a juvenile who participated in diversion, as defined in section 19-2.5-102, and does not apply to a diversion or deferral or plea for a
person who participated in and successfully completed the child abuse and child neglect diversion program as described in section 19-3-310.

The convictions identified in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section and in subsection (2) of this section must be determined according to the records of the Colorado bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation and the ICON
system at the state judicial department. The screening request in Colorado shall be made pursuant to section 19-1-307 (2)(k.5), rules promulgated by the state board pursuant to section 19-3-313.5, and 42 U.S.C. 671 (a)(2). A certified
copy of the judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction of the conviction, deferred judgment and sentence agreement, deferred prosecution agreement, or deferred adjudication agreement is prima facie evidence of a conviction or
agreement.

The state board shall adopt rules relating to background checks of relatives and placement of children in noncertified kinship care, including:

Rules on requirements that all county departments that place children in noncertified kinship care conduct and document that all of the background checks have been initiated and completed in accordance with section 19-3-406 and with this section for any
person providing noncertified kinship care and for any adult residing at the home;

Rules on the actions a county department should take if a disqualifying factor is found during any of the background checks specified in this section, including rules on reviewing the placement of children, addressing child safety issues, evaluating the
vulnerability and the age of the child, and identify alternative remedies to removal of the child from the placement.

Source:

L. 2015:
Entire section added, (SB 15-087), ch. 263, p. 1016, § 10, effective June 2.

L. 2017:
IP(1) and IP(1)(a) amended, (SB 17-189), ch. 149, p. 500, § 7, effective August 9.

L. 2021:
(4) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 732, § 77, effective October 1.